Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.36.050

Liability of officer.

A code city officer authorizing the affixing of his or her signature to a bond by a proxy shall be subject to the same liability personally and on his or her bond for any signature so affixed and to the same extent as if he or she had affixed his or her signature in person.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3037; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.36.050.]